District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.05

Execution, filing, and recording of statements.

(a)

A statement delivered to the Mayor for filing by a partnership shall be executed by at least 2 partners. Other statements shall be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter.

(b)

A person that delivers a statement to the Mayor for filing pursuant to this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person shall not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

(c)

A statement delivered to the Mayor for filing by a partnership shall be executed by at least 2 partners. Other statements shall be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter An individual who executes a statement shall personally declare under penalty of making false statements that the contents of the statement are accurate.

(d)

A person authorized by this chapter to deliver a statement to the Mayor for filing may amend or cancel the statement by delivering filing an amendment or cancellation to the Mayor for filing that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

(e)

A person that delivers a statement to the Mayor for filing pursuant to this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person shall not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(2)(D), 59 DCR 13171

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 105 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “making false statements” for “perjury” in (c).
1981 Ed., § 41-151.5.
2001 Ed., § 33-101.05.
This section is referenced in § 29-601.04, § 29-603.03, § 29-609.04, and § 29-610.01.